Utah statutes.
34A-2-419.   Agreements in addition to compensation and benefits.
(1) (a)  Subject to the approval of the division, any employer securing the
payment of workers' compensation benefits for its employees under Section
34A-2-201 may enter into or continue any agreement with the employer's
employees to provide compensation or other benefits in addition to the
compensation and other benefits provided by this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah
Occupational Disease Act.
(b)  An agreement may not be approved if it requires contributions from the
employees, unless it confers benefits in addition to those provided under this
chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, at least commensurate
with the contributions.
(c)  An agreement for additional benefits may be terminated by the division
if:
(i)  it appears that the agreement is not fairly administered;
(ii)  its operation discloses defects threatening its solvency; or
(iii)  for any substantial reason it fails to accomplish the purposes of this
chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act.
(d)  If the agreement is terminated, the division shall determine the proper
distribution of any remaining assets.
(e)  The termination under Subsection (1)(c) becomes a final order of the
commission effective 30 days from the date the division terminates the
agreement, unless within the 30 days either the employer or employee files an
application for hearing with the Division of Adjudication in accordance with
Part 8, Adjudication.  The application for hearing may contest:
(i)  the recommendation to terminate the agreement;
(ii)  the distribution of remaining assets after termination; or
(iii)  both the recommendation to terminate and the distribution of remaining
assets.
(2) (a)  Any employer who makes a deduction from the wages or salary of any
employee to pay for the statutory benefits of this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah
Occupational Disease Act, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
(b) Subject to the supervision of the division, nothing in this chapter or
Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, may be construed as preventing the
employer and the employer's employees from entering into mutual contracts and
agreements respecting hospital benefits and accommodations, medical and
surgical services, nursing, and medicines to be furnished to the employees as
provided in this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, if no
direct or indirect profit is made by any employer as a result of the contract
or agreement.
(3)  The purpose and intent of this section is that, where hospitals are
maintained and medical and surgical services and medicines furnished by the
employer from payments by, or assessments on, the employer's employees, the
payments or assessments may not be more or greater than necessary to make
these benefits self-supporting for the care and treatment of the employer's
employees.  Money received or retained by the employer from the employees for
the purpose of these benefits shall be paid and applied to these services.
Any hospitals so maintained in whole or in part by payments or assessment of
employees are subject to the inspection and supervision of the division as to
services and treatment rendered to the employees.
